New York, session 2025-2026, A10068.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3638 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. If a school district has received two extensions pursuant to para- 4 graph (a) of subdivision four of this section, due to the market avail- 5 ability of zero-emission school buses or supporting infrastructure and 6 cannot meet the requirements of subdivisions two and three of this 7 section, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district 8 shall not be subjected to any penalty, sanction, loss of funding, or 9 adverse action, provided that the school district demonstrates, to the 10 satisfaction of the commissioner, that it has made a good faith effort 11 to comply but are unable to due to the market availability of zero-emis- 12 sion school buses or supporting infrastructure. This includes, but is 13 not limited to, insufficient supply of zero-emission school buses, 14 delays in manufacturing, delays in delivery, and supply chain 15 disruptions affecting critical components. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14610-01-6